Illinois, session 104th, SB1812.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Labor Relations Act is 5amended by adding Section 11.5 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 315/11.5 new)7    Sec. 11.5. Make-whole relief. 8    (a) The Board may order make-whole relief, including, but 9not limited to, consequential damages and front pay for 10injuries suffered by employees or a labor organization as a 11result of an unfair labor practice. In determining appropriate 12relief for a violation of paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of 13Section 10 that is serious enough to have frustrated the 14purposes of the Act and that may have undermined or 15significantly impacted the collective bargaining process, the 16Board shall take into consideration factors that normally 17determine the outcome of collective bargaining when such 18bargaining has been conducted in good faith.19    (b) Violators of subsection (a) of Section 10 shall also 20be subject to liquidated damages under this Section in an 21amount equal to any monetary make-whole relief ordered by the 22Board unless the employer can show it acted in good faith and 23had reasonable grounds to believe it was acting in compliance   SB1812- 2 -LRB104 11978 BDA 22072 b1with this Act.